Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-170
Violations; effect.

Any licensee who permits, assents, or is a party in any way to any violation or infringement of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall be deemed guilty of a violation of the act. Any money loaned contrary to a provision of the act shall not be recovered back. Any note, mortgage, or other evidence of indebtedness, any security, or any lease or contract obtained or made contrary to the act shall be unenforceable and void.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 30, p. 397;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-330;

R.S.1943, § 53-170;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 7.